Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6338.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 37. (1) When a prisoner is released upon on parole, the department shall provide the prisoner with clothing and a nontransferable ticket to the place in which where the paroled prisoner is to reside. At the discretion of the deputy director in charge of the field operations administration, the paroled prisoner may be advanced the expense of the transportation to the place of residence and a sum of money necessary for reasonable maintenance and subsistence for a 2-week period, as determined by the deputy director. A sum of money given under this section shall must be repaid to the state by the paroled prisoner within not later than 180 days after the money is received by the paroled prisoner. (2) If a prisoner who is discharged without being paroled has less than $75.00 in his or her the prisoner's immediate possession, has no visible means of support, and has conserved personal funds in a reasonable manner, the department shall furnish to that prisoner all of the following: (a) Clothing that is appropriate for the season. (b) A sum of $75.00 including that amount already in the prisoner's possession. (c) Transportation to a place in this state where the prisoner will reside or work or to the place where the prisoner was convicted or sentenced. (3) When providing for transportation, the department shall do all of the following: (a) Use the most economical available public transportation. (b) Arrange for and purchase the prisoner's transportation ticket. (c) Assume responsibility for delivering that prisoner to the site of departure and confirming the prisoner's departure from the site. (4) The department shall provide a prisoner identification card to each prisoner when he or she the prisoner is released on parole or is released upon on completion of his or her the prisoner's maximum sentence. The identification card shall must include all of the following based upon on all available information: (a) The prisoner's photograph, taken every 3 years or upon on significant appearance change, whichever occurs first. (b) The prisoner's legal name as identified on the prisoner's birth certificate or on any 1 of the other citizenship identification documents specified by the secretary of state as being necessary to obtain an operator's license or official state personal identification card, if those documents are available. (c) The prisoner's date of birth. (d) A statement as to whether the prisoner was placed on parole or discharged upon on completion of his or her the prisoner's sentence. (5) The department shall provide a prisoner who menstruates with a 1-month supply of feminine hygiene products when the prisoner is released on parole or is released on the completion of the prisoner's maximum sentence. The department shall not charge a prisoner for feminine hygiene products provided or received under this subsection. (6) (5) The cost of implementing this section shall must be paid out of the general fund of the state. (7) As used in this section, "feminine hygiene products" means products used in connection with the menstrual cycle including, but not limited to, tampons and sanitary napkins. Sec. 65j. (1) On the request of a prisoner who menstruates and is in a correctional facility, the department shall provide feminine hygiene products to that prisoner. (2) The department shall not charge a prisoner for feminine hygiene products provided or received under subsection (1). (3) As used in this section, "feminine hygiene products" means products used in connection with the menstrual cycle including, but not limited to, tampons and sanitary napkins.